Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3212
Records; retention.

Each appraisal management company that holds a registration shall maintain a detailed record of appraisal management services provided under its registration, and upon request shall submit to the board all books, records, reports, documents, and other information as deemed appropriate by the board to administer and enforce the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act. Record retention requirements are for a period of five years after appraisal management services are completed or two years after final disposition of a judicial proceeding related to the appraisal management services, whichever period expires later.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 12;

Laws 2018, LB17, § 13.
July 19, 2018